en: maltodextrin, maltodextrins, maltodextrine, malto dextrin
bg: Малтодекстрин
ca: Maltodextrina
cs: Maltodextriny, maltodextrin
da: maltodextrin
de: Maltodextrin, Maltodextrine
el: Μαλτοδεξτρίνες, μαλτοδεξτρίνη
es: Maltodextrinas, maltodextrina
et: maltodekstriin
fi: maltodekstriini, maltodekstriiniä
fr: Maltodextrines, maltodextrine, malto-dextrine
he: מלטודקסטרינים
hr: maltodekstrin, maltodekstrini
hu: Maltodextrin
is: maltódextrín
it: Maltodestrine, maltodestrina
ja: マルトデキストリン
lt: maltodekstrinas
lv: maltodekstrīns, maltodekstrins
nb: maltodekstrin
nl: Maltodextrine
pl: Maltodekstryny, Maltodekstryna
pt: Maltodextrinas, maltodextrina
ro: maltodextrină, maltodextrina
ru: Мальтодекстрин, патока
sv: Maltodextriner, Maltodextrin
zh: 麦芽糊精

en: tapioca maltodextrin
de: Tapioka Maltodextrin, Tapioka-Maltodextrin
es: Maltodextrina de tapioca
fi: tapiokamaltodekstriini
fr: maltodextrine de tapioca, malto-dextrine de tapioca
hr: tapioka maltodekstrin
it: maltodestrine da tapioca
pl: maltodekstryna z tapioki

en: potato maltodextrin
bg: картофен малтодекстрин
de: Kartoffel-Maltodextrin
es: maltodextrina de patata
fi: perunamaltodekstriini
fr: maltodextrine de pomme de terre, malto-dextrine de pomme de terre
hr: krumpirov maltodekstrin
it: maltodestrina di patate
pl: maltodekstryna ziemniaczana, maltodekstryna z ziemniaków

en: corn maltodextrin
bg: царевичен малтодекстрин
de: Mais-Maltodextrin
es: maltodextrina de maiz
fi: maissimaltodekstriini
fr: maltodextrine de maïs, malto-dextrine de maïs
hr: kukuruzni maltodekstrin
it: maltodestrine di mais, Maltodestrina di Mais
nl: maïsmaltodextrine
pl: maltodekstryna kukurydziana
pt: maltodextrina de milho
sv: majsmaltodextrin

en: wheat maltodextrin
es: maltodextrina de trigo
fr: maltodextrine de blé
it: maltodestrina di frumento

en: raising agent, leavening agent, leavening, dough raising agent
ar: عامل نفاشية
ca: gasificants
cs: Kypřicí látka, Kypřidlo
cy: Lefain
da: Hævemiddel, hævemidler
de: Backtriebmittel, Triebmittel
el: Διογκωτικό αρτοποιίας
es: Gasificante, Agente leudante, agentes gasificantes, gasificantes, leavenings, leudantes químicos
et: Kergitusaine
fa: عامل ورآورنده
fi: nostatusaine, nostatusaineet
fr: agent levant, agent de levuration, agents levants, agents de levage
ga: Oibreán éiritheach
he: התפחה
hu: Térfogatnövelő szer
id: Bahan pengembang
is: lyftiefni
it: Agenti lievitanti, agente lievitante
ja: 膨張剤, 膨脹剤
ko: 팽창제
lt: Tešlos kildymo medžiaga, Puriklis
lv: Irdinātājs
ms: Agen penaik
mt: Aġent li jgħolli l-ikel
nb: Hevemiddel, hevemidler
nl: Rijsmiddel, Rijsmiddelen
pl: Substancja spulchniająca, spulchniacz
pt: levedante, levedantes, levedante químico, levedantes químicos, agente levedante, agentes levedantes
ro: Agent de afânare
ru: Разрыхлитель, разрыхлители
sk: Kypriaca látka
sl: Potisni plin, Kvas
sv: Jäsmedel, jäsningsmedel
tl: Pampaalsa
tr: Kabartma ajanı
uk: Розпушувач харчовий
zh: 膨松剂

en: yeast
af: Gis
am: እርሾ
an: Levaduras
ar: خميرة
be: Дрожджы
bg: мая
bn: ইস্ট
br: Goell
bs: Kvasci
ca: Rent, llevat
cs: droždí, kvasinky, kvasničný
cy: Burum
da: gær, gærsvamp
de: Hefe, Hefen
el: Ζυμομύκητες
eo: Gisto
es: lavadura, Levadura, levadura alimenticia
et: pärm, pärmiseened, pärmseened
eu: Legamia
fa: مخمر
fi: hiiva, Hiivat
fr: levure
fy: Gêst
ga: Giosta
gd: Beirm
gl: Lévedo
he: שמרים
hi: खमीर
hr: kvasac, majčin kvasac, kvasca, kvaščev, kvasa, kvasci
hu: élesztő
hy: Խմորասնկեր
id: Khamir
io: Hefo
is: Ger
it: lievito, crema di lievito, lieviti
ja: 酵母, イースト
jv: Khamir
ka: საფუარები
kk: Ашытқылар
ko: 효모
ku: Meya
lt: Mielės
lv: Raugs, Raugu produkti, ieraugs
mk: Квасец
ml: യീസ്റ്റ്
ms: Yis
nb: Gjær
nl: gist, gisten
nn: Gjær
no: gjær
pa: ਖ਼ਮੀਰ
pl: Drożdże, drożdżowe, drożdżowego, drożdżowy, drożdżowych, drożdży
pt: Levedura, Leveduras
qu: Qunchu
ro: Drojdie
ru: Дрожжи
sh: Kvasac
sk: Kvasinka
sl: Kvasovka, Kvasi
sn: Mbiriso
sr: kvasac, Квасац
sv: Jäst
sw: Hamira
ta: மதுவம்
th: ยีสต์
tr: Maya
ug: ئېچىتقۇ
uk: Дріжджі
ur: خمیر
vi: Nấm men
wa: Yesse
yi: הייוון
zh: 酵母

en: fresh yeast
bg: прясна мая
de: Frischhefe
es: levadura fresca
fi: tuorehiiva
fr: levure fraîche, levure de boulanger fraîche, levure fraîche de boulanger, levure de boulangerie fraîche, levure boulangère fraîche
it: lievito fresco
nl: verse gist

en: deactivated yeast
cs: inaktivované kvasnice, inaktivované sušené kvasnice
de: inaktivierte Hefe, inaktiveirte Hefe
es: levadura inactiva
fr: levure inactivée, levure désactivée
hr: deaktivirani kvasac
it: lievito inattivo
nl: gedeactiveerde gist
pl: drożdże nieaktywne, nieaktywne drożdże
sv: inaktiv jäst

en: deactivated yeast flake, deactivated yeast flakes
sv: inaktiv jästflinga, inaktiva jästflingor

en: vitamin D yeast
fi: d-vitamiinihiiva
fr: levure enrichie en vitamine D
hr: kvasac s vitaminom d
it: lievito di vitamina D
nl: vitamine D-gist

en: nutritional yeast
ar: رقائق الخميرة المغذية
bg: хранителна мая
de: nährhefe
eo: nutra gisto
fi: ravintohiiva
fr: levure alimentaire
hr: hranjivi kvasac
id: ragi nutrisional
it: lievito alimentare
ja: イーストフード
nl: edelgist
pl: drożdże odżywcze
ru: пищевые дрожжи
sv: näringsjäst, bjäst
uk: харчові дріжджі

en: nutritional yeast flake
fi: ravintohiivahiutale, ravintohiivahiutaleet, oluthiivahiutale, oluthiivahiutaleet
fr: flocons de levure alimentaire
hr: prehrambene pahuljice kvasca
it: lievito alimentare in scaglie
pl: płatki drożdżowe
sv: näringsjästflinga, näringsjästflingor

en: yeast powder, raising powder
bg: мая на прах
da: tørgær, tørret gær
de: Hefepulver
el: μαγιά σκόνη
es: levadura en polvo
fi: kuivahiiva, hiivajauhe
fr: poudre de levure, levure en poudre
hr: kvasac u prahu
hu: porélesztő, élesztőpor
it: lievito in polvere
nl: gistpoeder
pl: Drożdże w proszku
pt: levedura em pó
ru: Дрожжевой порошок
sv: torrjäst, jästpulver

en: baking powder
bg: бакпулвер
da: Bagepulver
de: Backpulver
es: Polvo gasificante
et: küpsetuspulber
fi: leivinjauhe
fr: levure chimique
he: אבקת אפייה, אבקת אפיה
hr: prašak za pecivo
hu: sütőpor
it: lievito chimico
ja: ベーキングパウダー
lv: cepamais pulveris
nb: bakepulver
nl: bakpoeder
pl: Proszek do pieczenia
pt: Fermento em pó
ro: praf de copt
sv: bakpulver

en: natural yeast
de: natürliche Hefe
es: Levadura natural
fi: Luontainen hiiva
fr: levure naturelle
hr: prirodni kvasac
it: naturale-fermento, lievito naturale

en: baker's yeast
ar: فطريات الخميرة
bg: хлебна мая, мая хлебна, мая за хляб
ca: Llevat de forner
cs: pekařské droždí
de: Backhefe
el: Μαγιά αρτοποιίας
es: levadura de panadería
et: Pinnakääritamine
fa: مخمر نان, ساکارومایسس سرویزیه
fi: leivinhiiva, viinihiiva
fr: levure de boulanger, levure de boulangerie, levure de panification, levure boulangère
he: שמר האפייה
hr: pekarski kvasac
hu: Élesztőgomba
is: Pressuger, Ölger
ja: 出芽酵母, パン酵母, ビール酵母
lt: kepimo mielės
mk: Лебен квасец
nb: bakegjær
nl: bakkersgist
nn: ølgjær
pl: drożdże piekarskie
pt: levedura para panificação
qu: Aqha qunchu
ro: drojdie de panificație
ru: Хлебопекарные дрожжи, дрожжи хлебопекарные прессованные, дрожжи хлебопекарные
sk: Pekárske droždie, Kvasinka pivná
uk: Пивні дріжджі
zh: 釀酒酵母

en: compressed baker's yeast
fr: levure de boulanger compressée, levure de boulanger pressée, levure de boulangerie compressée, levure de boulangerie pressée

en: dry baker's yeast, dried baker's yeast
fr: levure de boulanger sèche, levure de boulangerie sèche, levure boulangère sèche

bg: суха мая
de: Trockenhefe
fr: levure sèche
it: lievito secco